California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) “Officially designated scenic highway or scenic byway” does not include routes listed as part of the State Scenic Highway system, Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 260) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of the Streets and Highways Code, unless those routes, or segments of those routes, have been designated as officially designated state scenic highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5218.

“Penalty segment” means any segment of a highway located in this state which was not covered by the Federal Aid Highway Act of 1958 and the Collier-Z'berg Act but which is covered by the Highway Beautification Act of 1965, namely, any segment of an interstate highway which is constructed upon right-of-way, any part of the width of which was acquired prior to July 1, 1956, and any segment of a primary highway.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5219.

“Person” includes natural person, firm, cooperative, partnership, association, limited liability company, and corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5220.

“Primary highway” means any highway, other than an interstate highway, designated as a part of the federal-aid primary system in existence on June 1, 1991, and any highway that is not in that system but which is in the National Highway System.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1292, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5221.

“Sign” refers to any card, cloth, paper, metal, painted or wooden sign of any character placed for outdoor advertising purposes on or to the ground or any tree, wall, bush, rock, fence, building, structure or thing, either privately or publicly owned, other than an advertising structure.

“Sign” does not include any of the following:

(a) Official notices issued by any court or public body or officer.

(b) Notices posted by any public officer in performance of a public duty or by any person in giving any legal notice.

(c) Directional warning or information signs or structures required by or authorized by law or by federal, state or county authority.

(d) A sign erected near a city or county boundary that contains the name of that city or county and the names of, or any other information regarding, civic, fraternal, or religious organizations located within that city or county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 300, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5222.

“660 feet from the edge of the right-of-way” means 660 feet measured from the edge of the right-of-way horizontally along a line normal or perpendicular to the centerline of the highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5222.1.

“State highway system” means the state highway system as described in Section 300 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 991, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5223.

“Unzoned commercial or industrial area” means an area not zoned under authority of state law in which the land use is characteristic of that generally permitted only in areas which are actually zoned commercial or industrial under authority of state law, embracing all of the land on which one or more commercial or industrial activities are conducted, including all land within 1,000 feet, measured in each direction, from the nearest edge of the commercial or industrial building or activity on such land. As used in this section, “commercial or industrial activities” does not include the outdoor advertising business or the business of wayside fresh product vending.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5224.

“Visible” means capable of being seen (whether or not legible) without visual aid by a person of normal visual acuity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5225.

The verb, “to place” and any of its variants, as applied to advertising displays, includes the maintaining and the erecting, constructing, posting, painting, printing, tacking, nailing, gluing, sticking, carving or otherwise fastening, affixing or making visible any advertising display on or to the ground or any tree, bush, rock, fence, post, wall, building, structure or thing. It does not include any of the foregoing activities when performed incident to the change of an advertising message or customary maintenance of the advertising display.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5226.

The regulation of advertising displays adjacent to any interstate highway or primary highway as provided in Section 5405 is hereby declared to be necessary to promote the public safety, health, welfare, convenience and enjoyment of public travel, to protect the public investment in such highways, to preserve the scenic beauty of lands bordering on such highways, and to insure that information in the specific interest of the traveling public is presented safely and effectively, recognizing that a reasonable freedom to advertise is necessary to attain such objectives. The Legislature finds:

(a) Outdoor advertising is a legitimate commercial use of property adjacent to roads and highways.

(b) Outdoor advertising is an integral part of the business and marketing function, and an established segment of the national economy, and should be allowed to exist in business areas, subject to reasonable controls in the public interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5227.

It is the intention of the Legislature to occupy the whole field of regulation by the provisions of this chapter except that nothing in this chapter prohibits enforcement of any or all of its provisions by persons designated so to act by appropriate ordinances duly adopted by any county of this state nor does anything prohibit the passage by any county of reasonable land use or zoning regulations affecting the placing of advertising displays in accordance with the provisions of the Planning Law, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 65000) of Title 7 of the Government Code, relating to zoning, or, with reference to signs or structures pertaining to the business conducted or services rendered or goods produced or sold upon the property upon which such advertising signs or structures are placed, ordinances subjecting such signs or structures to building requirements.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5228.

It is declared to be the intent of the Legislature in enacting the provisions of this chapter regulating advertising displays adjacent to highways included in the national system of interstate and defense highways or the federal-aid primary highway system to establish minimum standards with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5229.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to permit a person to place or maintain in existence on or adjacent to any street, road or highway, including any interstate or state highway, any outdoor advertising prohibited by law or by any ordinance of any city, county or city and county.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5230.

The governing body of any city, county, or city and county may enact ordinances, including, but not limited to, land use or zoning ordinances, imposing restrictions on advertising displays adjacent to any street, road, or highway equal to or greater than those imposed by this chapter, if Section 5412 is complied with. No city, county, or city and county may allow an advertising display to be placed or maintained in violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 653, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5231.

The governing body of any city or city and county may enact ordinances requiring licenses or permits, or both, in addition to those imposed by this chapter, for the placing of advertising displays in view of any highway, including a highway included in the national system of interstate and defense highways or the federal-aid primary highway system, within its boundaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 653, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [5250. - 5254.]

5250.

The director may make orders and regulations for the enforcement of this chapter and may authorize the Department of Transportation to enforce its provisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5251.

Regulations promulgated by the director prior to November 8, 1967, concerning interstate highways constructed upon rights-of-way, the entire width of which was acquired after July 1, 1956, shall be continued in effect to the extent necessary to comply with the agreement with the Secretary of Commerce specified in Section 131(j) of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5252.

The director shall prescribe the form of all applications, licenses, permits and other appurtenant written matter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5253.

The director shall furnish requisite forms for applications, licenses and permits provided for in this chapter and may appoint a representative or agent in each of the counties throughout the state for the purpose of issuing the licenses and permits and collecting fees therefor as provided in this chapter. The agent or representative, in the discretion of the director, may be the county clerk in each county.

In the event of the appointment of the county clerk in any county by the director, the county clerk shall so act. Upon the issuance of any such license or permit by the authorized agent of the director, the agent shall immediately forward a copy thereof to the director.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5254.

The director may enforce the penalties for failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Application of Chapter [5270. - 5275.]

5270.

The regulation of the placing of advertising displays by this chapter, insofar as such regulation may affect the placing of advertising displays within view of the public highways of this state in unincorporated areas, shall be exclusive of all other regulations for the placing of advertising displays within view of the public highways of this state in unincorporated areas whether fixed by a law of this state or by a political subdivision thereof.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5271.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the provisions of this chapter apply only to the placing of advertising displays within view of highways located in unincorporated areas of this state, except that the placing of advertising displays within 660 feet from the edge of the right-of-way of, and the copy of which is visible from, interstate highways or primary highways, including the portions of such highways located in incorporated areas, shall be governed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1278, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5272.

(a) With the exception of Article 4 (commencing with Section 5300) and Sections 5400 to 5404, inclusive, this chapter does not apply to any advertising display used exclusively for any of the following purposes:

(1) To advertise the sale, lease, or exchange of real property on which the advertising display is placed.

(2) To advertise directions to, and the sale, lease, or exchange of, real property for which the advertising display is placed, provided that this exemption does not apply to advertising displays visible from a highway and subject to the Highway Beautification Act of 1965 (23 U.S.C. Sec. 131).

(3) To designate the name of the
 owner or occupant of the premises or to identify the premises.

(4) To advertise the business conducted, services rendered, or goods produced or sold on the property on which the advertising display is placed if the display is on the same side of the highway and within 1,000 feet of the point on the property or within 1,000 feet of the entrance to the site at which the business is conducted, services are rendered, or goods are produced or sold.

(5) To display only noncommercial public health, emergency, and safety messages from the County of San Joaquin, on public property and equipment owned and operated by the County of San Joaquin in conformance with state law, federal law, regulations, and agreements.

(b) With the exception of Article 4 (commencing with Section 5300) and Sections 5400 to 5404, inclusive, this
 chapter does not apply to any advertising display used exclusively either to advertise products, goods, or services sold by persons on the premises of an arena on a regular basis, or to advertise products, goods, or services marketed or promoted on the premises of an arena pursuant to a sponsorship marketing plan, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The arena is capable of providing a venue for professional sports on a permanent basis.

(2) The arena has a capacity of 15,000 or more seats.

(3) The advertising display is either of the following:

(A) Located on the premises of the arena.

(B) Has been authorized as of January 1, 2021, by, or in accordance with, a local ordinance,
 including, but not limited to, a specific plan or sign district adopted in connection with the approval of the arena by the city, county, or city and county, bears the name or logo of the arena, and is visible when approaching offramps from the interstate, primary, or state highways used to access the premises of the arena. No arena shall be permitted more than two advertising displays allowed under this subparagraph.

(c) (1) Any advertising display erected pursuant to subdivision (b) and located on the premises of the arena shall be lawful only if authorized by, or in accordance with, an ordinance, including, but not limited to, a specific plan or sign district, adopted by the city, county, or city and county, that regulates advertising displays on the premises of the arena by identifying the specific displays or establishing regulations that include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(A) Number of signs and total signage area allowed.

(B) Maximum individual signage area.

(C) Minimum sign separation.

(D) Illumination restrictions and regulations, including signage refresh rate, scrolling, and brightness.

(E) Illuminated sign hours of operation.

(2) Authorization of advertising displays under subdivision (b) is subject to the owner of the advertising display submitting to the department a copy of the ordinance adopted by the city, county, or city and county in which the arena is located authorizing the advertising display and, for signs located on the premises of the arena, identification of the provisions of
 the ordinance required under paragraph (1). The department shall certify that the proposed ordinance meets the minimum requirements contained in paragraph (1).

(3) An advertising display authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not advertise products, goods, or services related to tobacco, firearms, or sexually explicit material.

(4) This chapter does not limit a local government from adopting ordinances prohibiting or further restricting the size, number, or type of advertising displays permitted by this section.

(d) As used in this section, “the premises of an arena” means either of the following:

(1) A venue for indoor or outdoor sports, concerts, or other events.

(2) Any
 development project or district encompassing the venue, adjacent to it, or separated from it only by public or private rights-of-way, the boundaries of which have been set by the city, county, or city and county in which the arena is located. The development project or district shall be contiguous and shall not extend more than 1,000 feet beyond the arena structure or any structure physically connected to the arena structure.

(e) As used in this section, “sponsorship marketing plan” means an agreement between the property owner, facility owner, facility operator, or occupant of the premises of an arena and a sponsor pursuant to which the sponsor is allowed to include its logo, slogan, or advertising on advertising displays and that meets both of the following conditions:

(1) The sponsorship marketing plan is for a period of not less than 120 days.

(2) The sponsorship marketing plan grants the sponsor the opportunity to display its logo, slogan, or advertising in the interior of structures on the premises of an arena, or conduct promotions, public relations, or marketing activities on the premises of an arena.

(f) Authorization of an advertising display under subdivision (b) that is a message center display is subject to the owner of the display complying with one of the following conditions:

(1) Making a message center display within the premises of the arena available on a space-available basis for use by the department or the Department of the California Highway Patrol for public service messages, including Emergency Alert System (Amber Alert) messages disseminated pursuant to Section 8594 of the Government Code, and messages containing, among other things,
 reports of commute times, drunk driving awareness messages, reports of accidents of a serious nature, and emergency disaster communications.

(2) Making a message center display not subject to this section that is under the control of the owner of the advertising display available on a space-available basis for public service messages in a location acceptable to the department and the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(3) Providing funding to the department for the installation of a message center display to accommodate those public service messages, which may include funding as part of mitigation in connection with the approval of the arena by the city, county, or city and county.

(g) If an advertising display authorized under subdivision (b) is subject to a notice from the United States Department of
 Transportation, the Federal Highway Administration, or any other applicable federal agency to the state that the operation of that display will result in the reduction of federal aid highway funds provided in Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code, authorization of the display under subdivision (b) shall cease and the display owner shall remove all advertising copy from the display within 60 days after the state notifies the display owner of the receipt of the federal notice. Failure to remove the advertising copy pursuant to this subdivision shall result in a civil fine, imposed by the department, of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day until the advertising copy is removed. The department shall not assume any liability in connection with cessation of operation or removal of an advertising display or advertising copy pursuant to this subdivision.

(h) The city, county, or city and county adopting the ordinance authorizing the
 displays erected pursuant to this section shall have primary responsibility for ensuring that the displays remain in conformance with all provisions of the ordinance and of this section. If the city, county, or city and county fails to ensure that the displays remain in conformance with all provisions of the ordinance and of this section after 30 days of receipt of a written notice from the department, the city, county, or city and county shall hold the department harmless and indemnify the department for all costs incurred by the department to ensure compliance with the ordinance and this section or to defend actions challenging the adoption of the ordinance allowing the displays.

(i) An advertising display lawfully erected on or before December 31, 2013, in conformity with subdivision (e) of this section as it read on that date, shall remain authorized, subject to the terms of that subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 10.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5272.1.

(a) With the exception of Article 4 (commencing with Section 5300) and Sections 5400 and 5404, inclusive, nothing contained in this chapter applies to any advertising display that is exclusively on public property upon which is located a multimodal transit facility.

(b) This section applies to advertising displays only if the multimodal transit facility meets the following requirements:

(1) It is publicly owned and operated and is located on public land.

(2) It is identified as a critical component in the region’s sustainable communities strategy, as described in Section 65080 of the Government Code.

(3) One of the modes of transportation served at the multimodal transit facility is passenger rail.

(4) It is a current or future station for the high-speed train system in the corridor identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2704.04 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(c) To advertise any products, goods, or services on an advertising display pursuant to this section, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The advertising display shall be on the same side of the highway and within 1,000 feet of an entrance to a multimodal transit facility that meets the requirements of subdivision (b).

(2) The advertising display shall not advertise products, goods, or services related to tobacco, firearms, or sexually explicit material.

(3) Beyond the cost of erection, revenues from the advertising display shall be used to support the construction, operations, and maintenance of the multimodal transit facility. 

(4) The advertising display shall not cause a reduction in federal aid highway funds as provided in Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code. If an advertising display authorized under this section is subject to a notice from the United States Department of Transportation, the Federal Highway
 Administration, or any other applicable federal agency to the state that the operation of that display will result in the reduction of federal aid highway funds as provided in Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code, the display owner shall remove all advertising copy from the display within 60 days after the state notifies the display owner of the receipt of the federal notice. Failure to remove the advertising copy pursuant to this paragraph shall result in a civil fine, imposed by the California Department of Transportation, of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day until the advertising copy is removed. The department shall not assume any liability in connection with cessation of operation or removal of an advertising display or advertising copy pursuant to this paragraph.

(d) Any advertising display erected pursuant to this section shall be lawful only if authorized by, or in accordance with, an ordinance, including, but not
 limited to, a specific plan or sign district, adopted by the city, county, or city and county, as applicable, that regulates advertising displays by either identifying the specific displays or by establishing regulations that include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The number of signs and total signage area allowed.

(2) The maximum individual signage area.

(3) Minimum sign separation.

(4) Illumination restrictions and regulations, including signage refresh rate, scrolling, and brightness.

(5) Illuminated sign hours of operation.

(e) Authorization of an advertising display under this section shall also be subject to
 the owner of the display submitting, to the High-Speed Rail Authority, a copy of the ordinance authorizing the display that has been adopted by the applicable city, county, or city and county pursuant to subdivision (d). The High-Speed Rail Authority shall review and certify that the proposed display and the ordinance meet the minimum requirements of this section, including that the multimodal transit facility is or will be a current or future station for the high-speed train system pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b).

(f) The city, county, or city and county adopting the ordinance authorizing the displays erected pursuant to this section shall have the primary responsibility for ensuring that the displays remain in conformance with all provisions of the ordinance and of this section. If the city, county, or city and county fails to ensure that the displays are in conformance and shall remain in conformance with all provisions of the
 ordinance and of this section within 30 days of receipt of a written notice from the department, that one or more displays are out of conformance the city, county, or city and county shall hold the department harmless and indemnify the department for all costs incurred by the department to ensure compliance with the ordinance and this section or to defend actions challenging the adoption of the ordinance allowing the displays.

(g) Nothing in this section limits a city or county from adopting an ordinance prohibiting or further restricting the size, number, or types of advertising displays authorized by this section.

(h) Any law that applies to advertising displays authorized pursuant to Section 5272 shall also apply to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 545, Sec. 1.   (SB 694)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5272.2.

(a) With the exception of Article 4 (commencing with Section 5300) and Sections 5400 to 5404, inclusive, this chapter does not apply to any advertising display located in the geographic area in the City of Los Angeles bounded by Wilshire Boulevard on the northeast, S. Figueroa Street on the southeast, Interstate 10 on the southwest, and State Route 110 on the northwest, or to any advertising display located in the geographic area in the City of Los Angeles on the westerly side of State Route 110 bounded by West 8th Place, James M. Wood Boulevard, and Golden Avenue and bounded by 7th Street, South Bixel Street, West 8th Street, and Garland Avenue, or to any advertising display located in the geographic area in the City of Los Angeles on the westerly side of State Route 101 bounded by West Sunset Boulevard, North Bronson
 Avenue, Harold Way, and North Van Ness Avenue, and bounded by State Route 101, Vista Del Mar Avenue, Yucca Street, and Argyle Avenue, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) (A) The advertising display is authorized by, or in accordance with, an ordinance, including, but not limited to, a specific plan or sign district, adopted by the City of Los Angeles that regulates advertising displays by identifying the specific displays or establishing a set of regulations that include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(i) Number of signs and total signage area allowed.

(ii) Maximum individual signage area.

(iii) Minimum sign separation.

(iv) Illumination restrictions and regulations, including signage refresh rate, scrolling, and brightness.

(v) Illuminated sign hours of operation.

(B) The ordinance adopted by the City of Los Angeles described in this paragraph may authorize a framework of allowable signage that preserves flexibility in the ultimate placement, sizing, and scope of
 advertising displays, so long as those displays remain within the adopted limits and conditions described in this section.

(C) The ordinance adopted by the City of Los Angeles described in this paragraph may define a range or maximum signage capacity with which the City of Los Angeles and its designated partners may subsequently determine the final placement, size, and configuration of advertising displays.

(2) The owner of the advertising display has submitted to the department a copy of the ordinance adopted by the City of Los Angeles authorizing the advertising display and identification of the provisions of the ordinance required under paragraph (1) and the department has certified that the ordinance meets the minimum requirements contained in paragraph (1).

(3) The advertising display
 will not advertise products, goods, or services related to tobacco, firearms, or sexually explicit material.

(4) (A) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B), there shall be at least 500 feet between any two advertising displays located on the same side of the freeway unless the advertising displays are separated by buildings or other obstructions in a manner that only one of the advertising displays is visible from any given location on the freeway. For purposes of determining compliance with the spacing requirement, the distance between advertising displays shall be measured along the nearest edge of pavement between points directly opposite the advertising displays along each side of the freeway.

(B) The spacing requirement in subparagraph (A) does not apply to an advertising display that advertises only the business conducted, services rendered,
 or goods produced and sold upon the property upon which the advertising display is located and that, accordingly, is not subject to the requirements of this chapter.

(C) When counting the number of advertising displays and measuring the distance between them for purposes of subparagraph (A), the advertising displays described in subparagraph (B) shall be excluded from the count, and no measurements shall be made relative to the excluded advertising displays for purposes of subparagraph (A).

(5) This chapter does not limit the City of Los Angeles from adopting ordinances prohibiting or further restricting the size, number, or type of advertising displays permitted by this section. The City of Los Angeles may also adopt implementing ordinances that sequence or phase the authorization of advertising
 displays over time, provided that the total number, size, and area of those displays do not exceed the maximum limits certified under this section.

(6) If the advertising display is a message center, the owner of the display shall do one of the following:

(A) Make the message center display available on a space-available basis for use by the department or the Department of the California Highway Patrol for public service messages, including Emergency Alert System (Amber Alert) messages disseminated pursuant to Section 8594 of the Government Code, and messages containing, among other things, reports of commute times, drunk driving awareness messages, reports of accidents of a serious nature, and emergency disaster communications.

(B) Make a message center display not subject to this section
 that is under the control of the owner of the advertising display available on a space-available basis for public service messages in a location acceptable to the department and the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(C) Provide funding to the department for the installation of a message center display to accommodate those public service messages, which may include funding as part of mitigation in connection with the approval of development of the property on which the message center display is located by the City of Los Angeles.

(b) (1) Before the advertising display authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) may be placed, the department shall determine that the display will not cause a reduction in federal aid funds or otherwise be inconsistent with any federal law, regulation, or agreement between the state and a federal agency or department.

(2) If the department is unable to make the determination required pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall request the Federal Highway Administration (FHWA) of the United States Department of Transportation to make the determination. Upon receipt of a determination by the FHWA that makes the finding described in paragraph (1), the advertising display may be placed.

(c) The City of Los Angeles shall have primary responsibility for ensuring that a display authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) remains in conformance with all provisions of the ordinance and of this section. If the City of Los Angeles fails to ensure that the display remains in conformance with all provisions of the ordinance and of this section after 30 days of receipt of a written notice from the department, the City of Los Angeles shall hold the department harmless and indemnify the department for all costs
 incurred by the department to ensure compliance with the ordinance and this section or to defend actions challenging the adoption of the ordinance allowing the displays.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   (AB 770)   Effective October 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5272.5.

The department shall, when renegotiating an agreement with the Federal Highway Administration on the state’s obligations pursuant to the Highway Beautification Act of 1965 (23 U.S.C. Sec. 131), include among its priorities support for advertising displays at arenas, as described in Section 5272.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 11.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5273.

(a) Notwithstanding the dissolution of a state redevelopment agency and subject to subdivision (b), for purposes of this chapter, an advertising display advertising the businesses and activities developed within the boundary limits of, and as a part of, an individual redevelopment agency project, as those boundaries existed on December 29, 2011, and which was in use as of December 31, 2022, may continue to exist and be considered an on-premises display, as defined in Section 5490, and subject to the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 5300) and Sections 5400
 to 5404, inclusive, if the advertising display meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The advertising display is located within the boundary limits of the former project.

(2) The advertising display was constructed on or before January 1, 2012.

(3) The advertising display does not cause the reduction of federal aid highway funds provided pursuant to Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code. If an advertising display authorized under this section is subject to a notice from the United States Department of Transportation, the Federal Highway Administration, or any other applicable federal agency to the state that the operation of that display will result in the reduction of federal aid highway funds as
 provided in Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code, the display owner or operator shall remove all advertising copy from the display within 60 days after the date the state notifies the owner or operator, and the applicable city, county, or city and county, by certified mail, of the receipt of the federal notice. Failure to remove the advertising copy pursuant to this paragraph shall result in a civil fine, imposed by the California Department of Transportation, of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day until the advertising copy is removed. The department shall not assume any liability in connection with the cessation of operation or removal of an advertising display or advertising copy pursuant to this paragraph. If the name of the owner or operator of the display is not indicated on the display, the state is only required to send the notice to the applicable city, county, or city and
 county.

(b) An advertising display described in subdivision (a) may remain until January 1, 2026.

(c) The applicable city, county, or city and county shall be responsible for ensuring
 that an advertising display is consistent with this section and provides a public benefit. This provision shall not be construed to preclude any enforcement authority of the department under this chapter.

(d) The applicable city, county, or city and county authorizing an advertising display placed pursuant to this section shall have primary responsibility for ensuring that the display remains in conformance with all provisions of this section. If the city, county, or city and county fails to do so within 30 days of the date of mailing of a notice to the city, county, or city and county by the department, the city, county, or city and county shall hold the department harmless and indemnify the department for all costs incurred
 by the department to ensure compliance with this section or to defend actions challenging the authorization of displays pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 361, Sec. 1.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5273.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5273 and the dissolution of a state redevelopment agency, and subject to subdivision (b), for purposes of this section, an advertising display location that advertised businesses and activities within the boundary limits of the City of Inglewood may continue to exist and advertise businesses or activities operating outside the redevelopment project area. It shall be considered an on-premises display, as defined in Section 5490, if the
 advertising display meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The advertising display is located within the boundary limits of the City of Inglewood.

(2) The advertising display was constructed on or before January 1, 2012.

(3) The advertising display is adjacent to Interstate 405 and located at either postmile 22.36L or 22.38L north of Century Boulevard.

(4) The advertising display does not cause the reduction of federal aid highway funds provided pursuant to Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code. If an advertising display authorized under this section is subject to a notice from the United States Department of Transportation, the Federal Highway Administration, or any other applicable federal agency to the state that the operation of that
 display will result in the reduction of federal aid highway funds as provided in Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code, the display owner or operator shall remove all advertising copy from the display within 60 days after the date the state notifies the owner or operator, and the City of Inglewood, by certified mail, of the receipt of the federal notice. Failure to remove the advertising copy pursuant to this paragraph shall result in a civil fine, imposed by the California Department of Transportation, of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day until the advertising copy is removed. The department shall not assume any liability in connection with the cessation of operation or removal of an advertising display or advertising copy pursuant to this paragraph. If the name of the owner or operator of the display is not indicated on the display, the state is only required to send the notice to the City of Inglewood.

(b) An advertising